Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 4. Federal Aid [Repealed]

§ 21-13-401.
[Renumbered and Repealed.]

and (b) Repealed and renumbered by Laws 1987, ch. 190, §§ 4, 5.

Editor's notes. —

Subsection (a), which derived from Laws 1943, ch. 118, § 2, was repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 5, and related to the receipt of federal funds. For present similar provisions, see §§

21-2-602

and

21-2-603

. Subsection (b) was renumbered by Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 4 as §

21-2-601

.

§§ 21-13-402 and 21-13-403
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

21-2-602

and

21-2-603

by Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions relating to federal aid, see §§

21-2-602

and

21-2-603

.